Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2433
Department; contracts authorized.

In carrying out its responsibilities under the Livestock Waste Management Act, the department may contract with the various natural resources districts as appropriate. The contract may include all tasks or duties necessary to carry out the act but shall not enable the natural resources districts to issue National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permits or construction and operating permits or initiate enforcement proceedings. The contract may provide for payment of natural resources districts' costs by the department.

Laws 1998, LB 1209, § 11;

Laws 1999, LB 870, § 12;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 54-2411;

Laws 2004, LB 916, § 22;

Laws 2006, LB 975, § 14.